Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-218
Territory; transfer to another county; petition.

When a majority of the legal voters, residing upon any territory, shall petition the county board of their own county, and also of the county to which they desire such territory to be transferred, for leave to have such territory transferred to such county, it shall be the duty of the several county boards so petitioned to submit the question at the next general election in the counties; Provided, no such petition shall be granted until after the expiration of three years from last submission of the question.

Laws 1879, § 4, p. 354;

Laws 1885, c. 36, § 1, p. 210;

Laws 1889, c. 5, § 1, p. 74;

R.S.1913, § 929;

C.S.1922, § 835;

C.S.1929, § 25-218;

R.S.1943, § 22-218.

Where county has exercised undisputed jurisdiction for many years over portion of unorganized district under void act, the court, in exercise of sound public policy, will refuse to change boundary line. State ex rel. Halligan v. Clary, 100 Neb. 324, 160 N.W. 107 (1916).